Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 11 Prevention of Public Offenses
12-12-215. Registry of orders of protection.

The county sheriff shall immediately enter or cause to be entered such orders and any subsequent modifications or cancellations into the center system.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 995, § 1.

12-12-216. Carry forward.

At the close of each fiscal year, the Director of the Arkansas Crime Information Center shall certify to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State the amount, if any, of unexpended moneys and appropriations in the Crime Information System Fund or its successor resulting from the reimbursement to the Arkansas Crime Information Center by municipal, county, state, or federal governments for teleprocessing services.

(1)Any balance of such moneys and appropriations shall be carried forward and made available for the maintenance, operation, improvement, and other necessary expenditures in providing teleprocessing services to such municipal, county, state, and federal agencies served by the center.

The total amount that is carried forward under this section shall be reported in the budget manuals that are presented to the Legislative Council and Joint Budget Committee during the presession budget hearings.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 911, § 9; 2011, No. 779, § 8.

12-12-217. Annual report.

On July 31 of each year the Arkansas Crime Information Center shall submit an annual report to the Legislative Council showing the number of persons arrested for each criminal offense classification, comparing the state and each individual reporting agency.

The report shall include a breakdown by race of all persons arrested in each criminal offense classification.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1031, § 2; 2011, No. 779, § 9.

Ethnic minorities appear to be over represented in the population of persons who are involved in the criminal justice system, charged as defendants, convicted, and incarcerated throughout the United States criminal justice systems.

12-12-218. Registry of certain court orders — Definition.

As used in this section, “center system” means the registry of all court orders issued under §§5-2-310(b),5-2-314(b),20-47-214, and20-47-215 maintained by the Arkansas Crime Information Center under this section.

(1)The Arkansas Crime Information Center shall maintain the center system as provided under this section.

Only orders that are consistent with §5-2-310(b), §5-2-314(b), §20-47-214, or §20-47-215 shall be entered into the center system.

Information contained in the center system shall be determined by the Supervisory Board for the Arkansas Crime Information Center and shall include, at a minimum, the person's name and date of birth.

Information contained in the center system is not disclosable under applicable state or federal law and shall be available at all times only to courts, law enforcement personnel, and prosecuting attorneys.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 470, § 1.

12-12-219. Records of local and regional detention facilities.

(1)The Arkansas Crime Information Center shall permit and encourage the entry of data by a local or regional detention facility, such as a county jail, into a database maintained by the center and accessible by an entity as determined by the Supervisory Board for the Arkansas Crime Information Center.

Data provided by a regional detention facility shall facilitate analysis of inmate populations in local detention facilities, including, but not limited to:

Local or regional detention facility inmate population, including the number of inmates currently housed over the recognized maximum capacity of the local or regional detention facility; and

The types and number of offenses for which the inmates are being housed in the local or regional detention facility.

The types of data entered into a database under this section may include:

The center shall promulgate rules necessary to implement this section.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 423, § 9.

Subchapter 3

— State Crime Laboratory

12-12-301. Establishment.

There is established a State Crime Laboratory.

The laboratory shall offer services to law enforcement in:

Forensic pathology;

Toxicology;

Physical evidence analysis;

History.

Acts 1977, No. 517, § 1; 1979, No. 864, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1201; Acts 2019, No. 636, § 1.

12-12-302. Board created — Members — Meetings.

(1)There is created a State Crime Laboratory Board.

(A)The members of the board shall be appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate.

One (1) member of the active judiciary;

One (1) practicing member of the legal profession;

One (1) active county sheriff;

One (1) active chief of police;

One (1) active prosecuting attorney;

Two (2) physicians engaged in the active practice of private or academic medicine; and

One (1) member at large from the state.

(A)All appointments made at any time other than the day following the expiration of a term shall be made for the unexpired portion of the term.

The chair shall have the power to call meetings of the board upon due notice of the meeting to all members of the board.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 383, § 2; 1997, No. 250, § 67; 2011, No. 219, § 1.

12-12-303. Board's powers and duties generally.

The State Crime Laboratory Board shall promulgate such policies and rules as shall be necessary to carry out the intent and purpose of this subchapter along with the specific duties and responsibilities set out in this subchapter.

The board is authorized to accept gifts, grants, or funds from persons, associations, corporations, foundations, and federal or state governmental agencies and to use the gifts, grants, or funds for purposes of carrying out this subchapter or for any other purposes not inconsistent with the purposes and intent of this subchapter which may be authorized by the board.

The board is further authorized by this subchapter to enter into contracts, not inconsistent with law, and to do such things as it may deem necessary or appropriate to properly carry out the purposes and intent of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 864, §§ 4, 21; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-1206, 42-1223; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 860.

12-12-304. Director of the State Crime Laboratory.

(1)The State Crime Laboratory shall be headed by a director who shall be appointed by the Governor and who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

The director shall report to the Secretary of the Department of Public Safety.

The director may delegate specific duties to competent and qualified associates, assistants, and deputies who may act for the director within the scope of the authority granted him or her, subject, however, to such rules as may be prescribed by the State Crime Laboratory Board.

The board shall prescribe the duties, responsibilities, compensation, and qualifications for the director.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 864, §§ 5, 6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-1207, 42-1208; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 861; 2019, No. 910, §
5843.

12-12-305. Housing and equipment — Functions.

There shall be established under the supervision of the Director of the State Crime Laboratory a central office and laboratory facility sufficient and adequate to house the various functions of the State Crime Laboratory as set out in this subchapter and as may be necessary and proper for the laboratory to perform in carrying out its official duties and functions as provided by law.

The laboratory shall have the equipment and personnel necessary to respond to the needs of all law enforcement agencies in the State of Arkansas with respect to the following functions:

History.

Acts 1979, No. 864, §§ 7, 8; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-1209, 42-1210; 2013, No. 323, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5844.

12-12-306. State Medical Examiner.

The Director of the State Crime Laboratory shall appoint and employ a State Medical Examiner with the approval of the State Crime Laboratory Board and in consultation with the Secretary of the Department of Public Safety.

The director may remove the examiner only for cause and with the approval of the board.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 383, § 3; 2011, No. 775, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5845.

12-12-307. Medical examiners — Qualifications — Duties.

(1)The State Medical Examiner as well as associate medical examiners shall:

History.

Acts 1979, No. 864, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1211.

12-12-308. Medical examiners — Professional liability insurance.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 864, § 19; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1221.

12-12-309. Utilization of outside personnel.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 864, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1207; Acts 2017, No. 147, §
2; 2019, No. 910, § 5846.

12-12-310. Reimbursement for use of outside faculty.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 517, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1204; Acts 2017, No. 147, §
2.

12-12-311. Cooperation by others required — Tort immunity.

(A)The prosecuting attorney for each judicial district shall provide the laboratory each month with a list of cases having been adjudicated through plea negotiations and which require no further laboratory analysis.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 864, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1214; Acts 1999, No. 767, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5847.

12-12-312. Records confidential and privileged — Exception — Release.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 321, § 11; 1979, No. 864, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-621, 42-1218; Acts 1993, No. 1304, § 1; 1999, No. 519, § 1; 2001, No. 211, § 1; 2001, No. 917, § 1; 2011, No. 892, § 1; 2013, No. 298, § 1; 2015, No. 1040, § 1; 2019, No. 1001, § 1.

12-12-313. Records as evidence — Analyst's testimony.

The defendant shall give at least ten (10) days' notice prior to the proceedings that he or she requests the presence of the analyst of the laboratory who performed the analysis for the purpose of cross-examination.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to abrogate the defendant's right to cross-examine.

After notice to the defendant;

Upon proper showing of good cause and sufficient safeguards to satisfy all state and federal constitutional requirements of oath, confrontation, cross-examination, and observation of the witness's demeanor and testimony by the defendant, the court, and the jury; and

Absent a showing of prejudice by the defendant.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 864, § 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1220; Acts 1989, No. 889, §§ 1, 2; 1999, No. 565, § 1; 2013, No. 297, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5848.

12-12-314. Fees — Disposition.

A fee shall be charged for records and reports of the laboratory in a reasonable amount to be set by the board when the request for the report shall be from an entity other than a law enforcement or criminal justice system agency;

(A)A fee shall be charged in an amount to be set by the board for consultations, scientific or medical research, depositions, expert witness testimony, and travel to and from courts.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 350, § 4; 1979, No. 864, § 22; 1985, No. 644, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-1224, 42-1225; Acts 1995, No. 1189, § 1; 2011, No. 775, § 2; 2013, No. 296, § 1; 2013, No. 1129, § 1.

12-12-315. Notification of certain deaths.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an investigation, autopsy, or inquest in any case in which death occurred without medical attendance solely because the deceased was under treatment by prayer or spiritual means in accordance with the tenets and practices of a well-recognized church or religious denomination.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 321, § 5; 1973, No. 509, § 1; 1979, No. 864, § 10; 1985, No. 216, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-615, 42-1212; Acts 1993, No. 1302, § 1; 1995, No. 311, § 2; 2001, No. 80, § 2; 2007, No. 194, § 1; 2007, No. 594, § 1; 2009, No. 165, § 3; 2009, No. 1286, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 700, 701.

12-12-316. Transportation of corpses.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 864, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1215; Acts 1993, No. 1063, § 1; 1993, No. 1246, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5849.

12-12-317. Death certificates.

(A)The examiner or his or her designee performs a postmortem examination.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 864, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1219; Acts 1993, No. 177, § 1; 1995, No. 201, § 1; 2017, No. 417, § 1.

12-12-318. Examinations, investigations, and postmortem examinations — Authorization and restrictions.

(A)The laboratory shall make examinations, investigations, or perform postmortem examinations to determine the cause of death as the Director of the State Crime Laboratory or his or her staff deems necessary or as may be requested by the:

(A)Should any such postmortem examination determine that death occurred from foul play or a criminal act, the hospital will immediately notify the chief law enforcement officer of the jurisdiction in which the death occurred and the examiner.

The Director of the State Crime Laboratory shall use any and all material accumulated by the laboratory, interview all parties necessary, and consult with any medical authority necessary for him or her to make his or her decision as to the manner of death, and his or her ruling shall be final and binding as that ruling affects any documents generated and signed by any employee of the laboratory relating to manner of death.

This subsection and the director's decision in no way affects or prohibits any person or agency to seek any other relief that may be available through legal channels.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 321, § 6; 1973, No. 509, § 2; 1975, No. 736, § 1; 1979, No. 864, § 11; 1981, No. 65, § 1; 1985, No. 644, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-616, 42-1213; Acts 1993, No. 178, § 1; 1995, No. 1151, § 5; 1997, No. 422, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5850-5852.

12-12-319. Embalming corpse subject to examination, investigation, or autopsy — Penalty.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 864, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1216; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5853.

12-12-320. Autopsies — Removal of pituitary gland.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 984, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1213.2; Acts 2011, No. 779, § 10.

12-12-321. Autopsies — Exhumed bodies.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 864, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1217.

12-12-322. Hazardous duty pay.

It is recognized that many substances which may be encountered may create harmful health effects from either short-term or long-term exposure.

This special pay is to compensate the employees for the increased risk of personal injury.

The rate of pay will be one and one-half (1.5) times the regular authorized hourly pay or hourly rate of pay and will be paid only for the time while at the site of a clandestine laboratory.

Payment will be controlled by the Director of the State Crime Laboratory.

Class Code Title (1) B048 Chief Forensic Chemist; (2) Y023 Crime Lab Instrumentation Engineer, when performing the duties of a Forensic Chemist; (3) B057 Forensic Chemist; and (4) N336 Latent Prints Examiner.

Click to view table.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1151, § 4; 1997, No. 254, [§ 1]; 2019, No. 910, § 5854.

12-12-323. Crime Lab Equipment Fund.

The purchase of equipment;

Operating expenses;

Constructing and equipping regional crime laboratories; and

The personal services and operating expenses of regional crime laboratories.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1120, § 3; 2001, No. 1066, § 1; 2001, No. 1642, § 3.

12-12-324. Testing by State Crime Laboratory.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1558, §§ 1, 2; 2001, No. 788, § 1; 2005, No. 1257, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 862; 2019, No. 910, § 5855; 2019, No. 1010, § 1.

12-12-325. [Repealed.]

“Eligible person” means a person with an eligibility similar to a firefighter or police officer under the Public Safety Officers' Benefits Act of 1976 or the Hometown Heroes Survivors Benefits Act of 2003, 42 U.S.C. § 3796 et seq., as appropriate;

“Firefighter” means any member of a fire department or fire fighting unit of the Arkansas Forestry Commission, any city of the first class or city of the second class, any town, or any unincorporated rural area of this state, who actively engages in the fighting of fires on either a regular or voluntary basis; and

“Police officer” means any law enforcement officer engaged in official duty who is:

(A)If the examiner does not perform an autopsy under this section, he or she shall provide to the firefighter's or police officer's commanding officer or the supervisor of the eligible person written notice stating the reason why an autopsy was not performed.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 69, § 1; 2009, No. 165, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 5856.

Subchapter 4

— Sexual Assault — Medical-Legal Examinations

12-12-401. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Appropriate emergency medical-legal examinations” means health care delivered with emphasis on the collection of evidence for the purpose of prosecution.

It shall include, but not be limited to, the appropriate components contained in an evidence collection kit for sexual assault examination distributed by the Forensic DNA Section of the State Crime Laboratory;

“Licensed health care provider” means a person licensed in a healthcare field who conducts medical-legal examinations;

“Medical facility” means any healthcare provider that is currently licensed by the Department of Health and providing emergency services; and

“Victim” means any person who has been a victim of any alleged sexual assault or incest as defined by § 5-14-101 et seq. and § 5-26-202.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Law Enforcement and Emergency Management, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 501.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 403, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 41-1820 — 41-1822; Acts 1991, No. 612, § 1; 2001, No. 993, § 1; 2003, No. 1390, § 3.

12-12-402. Procedures governing medical treatment.

All medical facilities or licensed healthcare providers conducting medical-legal examinations in Arkansas shall adhere to the procedures set forth in this section in the event that a person presents himself or herself or is presented for treatment as a victim of rape, attempted rape, any other type of sexual assault, or incest.

Any adult victim presented for medical treatment shall make the decision of whether or not the incident will be reported to a law enforcement agency.

No medical facility or licensed healthcare provider may require an adult victim to report the incident in order to receive medical treatment.

Evidence will be collected only with the permission of the victim.

However, permission shall not be required when the victim is unconscious, mentally incapable of consent, or intoxicated.

Should an adult victim wish to report the incident to a law enforcement agency, the appropriate law enforcement agencies shall be contacted by the medical facility or licensed healthcare provider or the victim's designee.

The victim shall be given a medical screening examination by a qualified medical person as provided under the Emergency Medical Treatment and Active Labor Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1395dd, as in effect on January 1, 2001, if the victim arrives at the emergency department of a hospital, and the person shall be examined and treated and any injuries requiring medical attention will be treated in the standard manner.

A medical-legal examination shall be conducted and specimens shall be collected for evidence.

If a law enforcement agency has been contacted and with the permission of the victim, the evidence shall be turned over to the law enforcement officers when they arrive to assume responsibility for investigation of the incident.

Any victim under eighteen (18) years of age shall be examined and treated, and any injuries requiring medical attention shall be treated in the standard manner.

A medical-legal examination shall be performed, and specimens shall be collected for evidence.

The reporting medical facility or licensed healthcare provider shall follow the procedures set forth in Subchapter 4 of the Child Maltreatment Act, § 12-18-101 et seq., regarding the reporting of injuries to victims under eighteen (18) years of age.

The evidence shall be turned over to the law enforcement officers when they arrive to assume responsibility for investigation of the incident.

Reimbursement for the medical-legal examinations shall be available to the medical facility or licensed healthcare provider pursuant to the procedures set forth in § 12-12-403.

A medical facility or licensed healthcare provider shall not transfer the victim to another medical facility unless:

The victim or a parent or guardian of a victim under eighteen (18) years of age requests the transfer, or a physician or other qualified medical personnel when a physician is not available has signed a certification that the benefits to the victim's health would outweigh the risks to the victim's health as a result of the transfer; and

The transferring medical facility or licensed healthcare provider provides all necessary medical records and ensures that appropriate transportation is available.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 758, § 29, provided:

“Contingent Effectiveness. This act shall not become effective unless an act of the Eighty-Seventh General Assembly repealing the Arkansas Child Maltreatment Act, §12-12-501 et seq., and enacting a new Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq., becomes effective.”

The contingency in Acts 2009, No. 758, § 29, was met by Acts 2009, No. 749.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “Subchapter 4 of the Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq.” for “§12-12-507” in (c)(3).

The 2017 amendment by No. 250 redesignated (e)(1)(A) and (B) as (e)(1); substituted “victim's health” for “patient's health” twice in (e)(1); and substituted “healthcare” for “health care” in (e)(2).

The 2017 amendment by No. 845 substituted “A medical facility or licensed healthcare provider shall not transfer the victim” for “The victim shall not be transferred” in the introductory language of (e); redesignated (e)(1)(A) and (B) as (e)(1); substituted “victim's health” for “patient's health” twice in (e)(1); and substituted “healthcare” for “health care” in (e)(2).

However, the time limitation of ninety-six (96) hours may be waived if the victim is a minor or if the Crime Victims Reparations Board finds that good cause exists for the failure to provide the medical-legal examination within the required time.

(A)This subsection does not require a victim of sexual assault to participate in the criminal justice system or to cooperate with law enforcement in order to be provided with a forensic medical exam or reimbursement for charges incurred on account of a forensic medical exam, or both.

Subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section does not preclude a report of suspected abuse or neglect as permitted or required by the Child Maltreatment Act, § 12-18-101 et seq.

(1)A medical facility or licensed healthcare provider that performs a medical-legal examination shall submit a sexual assault reimbursement form, an itemized statement that meets the requirements of 45 C.F.R. § 164.512(d), as it existed on January 2, 2001, directly to the board for payment.

Acceptance of payment of the expenses of the medical-legal examination by the board shall be considered payment in full and bars any legal action for collection.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 758, § 29, provided:

“Contingent Effectiveness. This act shall not become effective unless an act of the Eighty-Seventh General Assembly repealing the Arkansas Child Maltreatment Act, §12-12-501 et seq., and enacting a new Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq., becomes effective.”

The contingency in Acts 2009, No. 758, § 29, was met by Acts 2009, No. 749.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment redesignated former (b) as present (b)(1)(A); deleted “following conditions are met” following “provided the” in (b)(1)(A); deleted former (b)(1); deleted the former (b)(2)(A) designation; added present (b)(2); and made minor punctuation and stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment substituted “Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq.” for “Arkansas Child Maltreatment Act, §12-12-501 et seq.” in (b)(2)(B).

The 2017 amendment, in (b)(1)(A), substituted “if the victim receives” for “provided the victim must receive” and “ninety-six (96)” for “seventy-two (72)” preceding “hours”; and, in (b)(1)(B), substituted “time limitation of ninety-six (96) hours” for “seventy-two-hour time limitation” and “medical-legal examination” for “exam”.

Cited: Griswold v. State, 290 Ark. 79, 716 S.W.2d 767 (1986).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “standards and rules” for “standards, rules, and regulations” in the first sentence of (b).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 400, §§ 1, 2; 1985, No. 838, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 41-1828, 41-1829; Acts 1991, No. 612, § 2; 2001, No. 993, § 2; 2009, No. 758, § 23; 2017, No. 250, § 4; 2017, No. 845, § 3.

12-12-403. Examinations and treatment — Payment.

All licensed emergency departments shall provide prompt, appropriate emergency medical-legal examinations for sexual assault victims.

(1)(A)All victims shall be exempted from the payment of expenses incurred as a result of receiving a medical-legal examination if the victim receives the medical-legal examination within ninety-six (96) hours of the attack.

The medical facility or licensed healthcare provider shall not submit any remaining balance after reimbursement by the board to the victim.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 403, §§ 4, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 41-1823, 41-1824; Acts 1991, No. 396, § 8; 2001, No. 993, § 3; 2007, No. 676, § 4; 2009, No. 758, § 24; 2017, No. 920, § 1.

12-12-404. Reimbursement of medical facility — Rules.

The Crime Victims Reparations Board may reimburse any medical facility or licensed healthcare provider that provides the services outlined in this subchapter for the reasonable cost for such services.

The board is empowered to prescribe minimum standards and rules necessary to implement this subchapter. These shall include, but not be limited to, a cost ceiling for each claim and the determination of reasonable cost.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 403, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 41-1825; Acts 1991, No. 396, § 1; 2001, No. 993, § 4;
2019, No. 315, § 863.

12-12-405. License suspension or revocation.

Noncompliance with the provisions of this subchapter is grounds for licensure suspension or revocation pursuant to the provisions of §20-9-215 or any other provisions governing the licensure of medical facilities or healthcare providers.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 612, § 3; 2001, No. 993, § 5.

12-12-406. Sexual assault collection kits — Submission for testing — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Anonymous kit” means a sexual assault collection kit that is collected from a possible victim of a sexual assault who has not decided whether to report the sexual assault to a law enforcement agency;

“Healthcare provider” means a person or facility that provides a medical-legal examination;

“Law enforcement agency” means a police force or organization whose primary responsibility as established by statute or ordinance is the enforcement of the criminal laws, traffic laws, or highway laws of this state;

“Medical-legal examination” means health care delivered to a possible victim of a sexual assault, with an emphasis on the gathering and preserving of evidence for the purpose of serving criminal justice;

“Sexual assault” means an offense described in § 5-14-101 et seq. or § 5-26-202; and

“Sexual assault collection kit” means a human biological specimen or specimens collected during a medical-legal examination from the alleged victim of a sexual assault.

A healthcare provider that has collected required victim information as part of a medical-legal examination shall enter the required victim information into a sexual assault collection kit tracking system of the State Crime Laboratory before transferring the sexual assault collection kit to a law enforcement agency with jurisdiction.

The system described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall provide secure electronic access that allows a law enforcement agency, a healthcare provider, the laboratory, and a victim to access tracking information.

A sexual assault collection kit collected by a healthcare provider shall be taken into custody by a law enforcement agency as soon as possible and within three (3) business days of notice from the healthcare provider.

A law enforcement agency that receives a sexual assault collection kit from a healthcare provider shall enter all necessary information into the system described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

A law enforcement agency that receives a sexual assault collection kit from a healthcare provider that relates to a report of a sexual assault that occurred outside of the jurisdiction of the law enforcement agency shall have the sexual assault collection kit delivered to the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction within ten (10) days of learning that the other law enforcement agency has jurisdiction.

A sexual assault collection kit shall be submitted to the laboratory by the receiving law enforcement agency as soon as possible, but no later than fifteen (15) days after receipt of the sexual assault collection kit.

A law enforcement agency is not required to submit an anonymous kit to the laboratory if the victim does not affirmatively request submission.

If a victim chooses to provide a personal statement about the sexual assault to a law enforcement agency at any time after initially declining to provide a personal statement, the anonymous kit shall be delivered to the laboratory as soon as possible, but no later than fifteen (15) days after the victim chooses to provide a personal statement to the law enforcement agency.

If available, a suspect standard or a consensual partner elimination standard shall be submitted to the laboratory:

With the sexual assault collection kit, if available, at the time the sexual assault collection kit is submitted; or

As soon as possible, but no later than fifteen (15) days from the date the sexual assault collection kit was obtained by the law enforcement agency, if the suspect standard or consensual partner elimination standard is not obtained until after the sexual assault collection kit is submitted.

Starting July 1, 2019, the laboratory shall test all sexual assault collection kits that are received from a law enforcement agency with the goal of developing autosomal DNA profiles that are eligible for entry into the Combined DNA Index System.

Sexual assault collection kits shall be tested by the laboratory and the tests completed within sixty (60) days of receipt from the law enforcement agency.

The ability of the laboratory to complete all tests within sixty (60) days of receipt may be dependent upon the following factors:

The number of sexual assault collection kits that the laboratory receives;

The technology and improved testing methods available;

The establishment of a fully trained and dedicated staff to meet the caseload; and

The number of lab requests received relating to other crime categories.

Failure to meet a deadline established under this subsection or administrative rule is not a basis for dismissal of a criminal action or a bar to the admissibility of the evidence in a criminal action.

Publisher's Notes. Former subchapter 5, concerning the reporting of child abuse, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 1208, § 17. The former subchapter was derived from the following sources:

12-12-501. Acts 1975, No. 397, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-807n.

12-12-502. Acts 1975, No. 397, § 2; 1979, No. 624, § 1; 1981, No. 907, § 1; 1985, No. 1033, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-807.

12-12-503. Acts 1975, No. 397, § 11; 1985, No. 1033, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-816.

12-12-504. Acts 1975, No. 397, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-808; Acts 1988 (4th Ex. Sess.), No. 5, § 4; 1988 (4th Ex. Sess.), No. 15, § 4.

12-12-505. Acts 1975, No. 397, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-809.

12-12-506. Acts 1975, No. 397, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-810.

12-12-507. Acts 1975, No. 397, §§ 2, 7; 1979, No. 624, §§ 1, 2; 1981, No. 907, § 1; 1985, No. 407, §§ 1, 2; 1985, No. 1033, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-807, 42-812; Acts 1989, No. 824, § 1.

12-12-508. Acts 1975, No. 397, § 8; 1979, No. 624, § 3; 1985, No. 1033, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-813; Acts 1987, No. 1036, §§ 1, 2.

12-12-509. Acts 1975, No. 397, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-811.

12-12-510. Acts 1975, No. 397, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-814; Acts 1987, No. 1036, § 3.

12-12-511. Acts 1975, No. 397, § 10; 1979, No. 75, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-815; Acts 1989, No. 421, § 1.

12-12-512. Acts 1975, No. 397, § 12; 1985, No. 425, § 1; 1985, No. 672, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-817.

12-12-513. Acts 1975, No. 397, § 12; 1985, No. 425, § 1; 1985, No. 672, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-817.

12-12-514. Acts 1975, No. 397, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-818; Acts 1989, No. 687, § 1.

12-12-515. Acts 1975, No. 397, § 13; 1979, No. 624, § 4; 1985, No. 1033, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-818, 42-819; Acts 1987, No. 1036, §§ 6, 7; 1989, No. 28, § 1.

12-12-516. Acts 1975, No. 397, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-818; Acts 1987, No. 1036, §§ 4, 5, 7; 1989, No. 863, § 1.

12-12-517. Acts 1975, No. 397, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-818.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Section12-12-504 was amended by Acts 2009, No. 165, § 5, to clarify the culpable mental state required to commit the criminal offenses and to clarify the criminal offenses. However, §12-12-504 was also specifically repealed by Acts 2009, No. 749, § 2.

Section12-12-505 was amended by Acts 2009, No. 954, § 1, to amend the procedure for removing an offender's name from the statewide central registry for cases involving allegations of child maltreatment. However, §12-12-505 was also specifically repealed by Acts 2009, No. 749, § 2, and a new section concerning removal of names from the Child Maltreatment Central Registry, §12-18-908, was enacted by Acts 2009, No. 749, § 1.Section12-18-908 includes similar provisions to the amendments to § 12-12-505 that were made by Acts 2009, No. 954, § 1.

Section12-12-507 was amended by Acts 2009, No. 629, § 1, to expand the list of mandated reporters of child maltreatment. However, §12-12-507 was also specifically repealed by Acts 2009, No. 749, § 2, and a new section concerning mandated reporters of child maltreatment, §12-18-402, was enacted by Acts 2009, No. 749, § 1.Section12-18-402 was subsequently amended by Acts 2009, No. 1409, § 1, to include the amendments to § 12-12-507 that were made by Acts 2009, No. 629, § 1.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter was repealed by Acts 2009, No. 749, § 2. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

12-12-501. Acts 1991, No. 1208, § 1; 2001, No. 1210, § 1; 2003, No. 758, § 1.

12-12-502. Acts 1991, No. 1208, § 14; 1997, No. 1234, § 1.

12-12-503. Acts 1991, No. 1208, § 2; 1993, No. 1126, §§ 3-5; 1995, No. 804, § 2; 1995, No. 1341, §§ 1-3; 1997, No. 1334, § 1; 1999, No. 36, § 1; 1999, No. 1340, §§ 22-25, 34, 36; 2001, No. 1210, § 2; 2003, No. 175, § 1; 2003, No. 758, § 2; 2005, No. 1176, § 2; 2005, No. 1706, § 1; 2007, No. 284, § 1; 2007, No. 586, § 1.

12-12-504. Acts 1991, No. 1208, § 12; 1995, No. 1341, § 4; 1997, No. 1351, § 1; 2007, No. 586, § 2.

12-12-505. Acts 1991, No. 1208, §§ 8, 9; 1993, No. 1088, § 1; 1995, No. 1341, § 5; 1997, No. 1334, § 2; 2001, No. 1210, § 3; 2001, No. 1434, § 1; 2003, No. 758, §§ 3, 4; 2005, No. 1706, § 2.

12-12-506. Acts 1991, No. 1208, § 9; 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 49, § 2; 1995, No. 1341, § 6; 1997, No. 1334, § 3; 1999, No. 1222, §§ 4, 5; 1999, No. 1340, §§ 26, 27; 2001, No. 1210, § 4; 2003, No. 758, §§ 5, 6; 2005, No. 1706, §§ 3-5; 2007, No. 586, § 3.

12-12-507. Acts 1991, No. 1208, §§ 3, 4; 1993, No. 1126, § 6; 1995, No. 1341, §§ 7, 8; 1999, No. 214, § 1; 2001, No. 1210, § 5; 2001, No. 1236, § 1; 2003, No. 758, §§ 7-9; 2003, No. 1039, § 1; 2005, No. 912, § 1; 2005, No. 1176, § 5; 2005, No. 1706, §§ 6-8; 2007, No. 284, § 2; 2007, No. 586, §§ 4, 5; 2007, No. 703, §§ 9, 10, 11.

12-12-508. Acts 1991, No. 1208, § 3; 1997, No. 535, § 1; 1999, No. 1340, § 28; 2001, No. 1210, § 6; 2007, No. 586, § 6.

12-12-509. Acts 1991, No. 1208, § 4; 1995, No. 1341, § 9; 1997, No. 535, § 2; 1997, No. 1334, § 4; 1999, No. 626, § 1; 2001, No. 1210, § 7; 2003, No. 175, § 2; 2003, No. 758, § 10; 2005, No. 1466, § 5; 2005, No. 1706, §§ 9, 10; 2007, No. 284, § 3; 2007, No. 586, § 7.

12-12-510. Acts 1991, No. 1208, § 4; 1993, No. 1126, § 7; 1997, No. 1334, § 5; 1999, No. 1340, § 29; 2003, No. 758, §§ 11, 12; 2005, No. 1706, §§ 11, 12; 2007, No. 586, § 8.

12-12-511. Acts 1991, No. 1208, § 4; 1995, No. 1341, § 10; 1997, No. 1334, § 6; 2001, No. 1210, § 8.

12-12-512. Acts 1991, No. 1208, §§ 5, 7; 1993, No. 1126, § 8; 1995, No. 804, § 3; 1995, No. 1341, § 11; 1997, No. 1334, § 7; 1999, No. 1340, § 30; 2001, No. 1210, § 9; 2003, No. 758, §§ 13, 14; 2005, No. 132, § 1; 2005, No. 172, §§ 1, 2; 2005, No. 1706, § 13; 2007, No. 161, §§ 1, 2; 2007, No. 284, § 4; 2007, No. 586, § 9.

12-12-513. Acts 1991, No. 1208, § 7; 2001, No. 1210, § 10.

12-12-514. Acts 1991, No. 1208, § 6; 1995, No. 1341, § 12; 1997, No. 1334, § 8; 2001, No. 1210, § 11; 2003, No. 758, § 15.

12-12-515. Acts 1991, No. 1208, § 9; 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 49, § 1; 1995, No. 1341, § 13; 1997, No. 1334, § 9; 2001, No. 1210, § 12; 2003, No. 758, § 16.

12-12-516. Acts 1991, No. 1208, § 10; 1999, No. 1340, § 31; 2001, No. 1210, § 13; 2003, No. 758, § 17; 2003, No. 1166, § 32; 2005, No. 1706, § 14;2007, No. 586, § 10; 2007, No. 703, § 12.

12-12-517. Acts 1991, No. 1208, § 11; 2005, No. 1706, § 15.

12-12-518. Acts 1991, No. 1208, § 13; 2001, No. 1210, § 14; 2003, No. 1039, § 2.

12-12-519. Acts 2001, No. 1210, § 15.

For current law, see the Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1949, No. 258, § 4: approved Mar. 8, 1949. Emergency clause provided: “It having been ascertained that immediate report of knife and gunshot injury would curtail crime and assist peace officers in performance of their duties, and being necessary for the health, peace, and safety of the public, an emergency is hereby declared, and this act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

History.

Acts 2019, No. 839, § 1.

Subchapter 5

— Child Abuse Reporting

12-12-501 — 12-12-519. [Repealed.]

12-12-601. Penalty.

Any person violating any provision of this subchapter shall be guilty of a violation and shall be fined in any amount not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 258, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-503; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 76.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor.”